sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Kalendrar och planeringskalendrar: Skrivbordskalendrar; Organisatörer; Planerare; Väggkalendrar
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Calendriers, organiseurs et agendas: Calendriers de bureau; Organisateurs; Planificateurs; Calendriers muraux
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Kalendarze, organizery i terminarze: Kalendarze biurkowe; Organizery; Terminarze; Kalendarze ścienne
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Lịch, bản kế hoạch và lịch trình: Lịch để bàn; Bản kế hoạch; Lịch trình; Lịch treo tường
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Kalendari, rokovnici i planeri: Stolni kalendari; Rokovnici; Planeri; Zidni kalendari
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Calendari, portaoggetti e agende: Calendari da tavolo; Organizzatori; Pianificatori; Calendari da parete
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Kalender, Organizer & Zeitplaner: Tischkalender; Organizer; Planer; Wandkalender
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 日曆/手帳/日誌: 桌曆; 行事曆; 行程規劃用品; 掛曆
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Calendarios, organizadores y agendas: Calendarios de escritorio; Organizadores; Planificadores; Calendarios de pared
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 달력/수첩/계획표: 탁상 달력; 수첩; 계획표; 벽걸이 달력
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Takvimler, Organizerler ve Planlayıcılar: Masa Takvimleri; Organizerler; Planlayıcılar; Duvar Takvimleri
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Naptárak, szervezők és tervezők: Asztali naptárak; Szervezők; Tervezők; Fali naptárak
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Kalendere og planleggere: Bordkalendere; Organisering; Planleggere; Veggkalendere
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Kalendáře, diáře a plánovače: Stolní kalendáře; Organizéry; Plánovače; Nástěnné kalendáře
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Kalenterit, säilytys ja suunnittelutyökalut: Pöytäkalenterit; Säilytysratkaisut; Suunnittelutyökalut; Seinäkalenterit
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Kalendáre, organizéry a plánovače: Stolové kalendáre; Organizéry; Plánovače; Nástenné kalendáre
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Ημερολόγια, οργανωτές & προγραμματιστές: Επιτραπέζια ημερολόγια; Οργανωτές; Προγραμματιστές; Ημερολόγια τοίχου
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Agenda's, organizers en planners: Bureauagenda's; Organizers; Planners; Wandagenda's
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Calendars, Organizers & Planners: Desk Calendars; Organizers; Planners; Wall Calendars
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Calendare, organizatoare și agende de planificare: Calendare de birou; Organizatoare; Agende de planificare; Calendare de perete
da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Kalendere og planlæggere: Skrivebordskalendere; Organisatorer; Planlæggere; Vægkalendere
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > カレンダー・手帳: 卓上カレンダー; オーガナイザー; プランナー; 壁掛けカレンダー
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > ปฏิทิน สมุดบันทึกและวางแผนงาน: ปฏิทินตั้งโต๊ะ; สมุดบันทึกงาน; สมุดวางแผนงาน; ปฏิทินติดผนัง
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Calendários, organizadores e agendas: Calendários de mesa; Organizadores; Planejadores; Calendários de parede
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Kalendoriai, darbo knygos ir planuokliai: Staliniai kalendoriai; Darbo knygos; Planuokliai; Sieniniai kalendoriai
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Koledarji, organizatorji in planerji: Namizni koledarji; Organizatorji; Planerji; Stenski koledarji
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Календари, органайзеры и планировщики: Настольные календари; Органайзеры; Планировщики; Настенные календари
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 日程本: 台历; 收纳用品; 计划表; 挂历
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Календари, органайзери и планери: Настолни календари; Органайзери; Планери; Стенни календари
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Calendários, organizadores e planificadores: Calendários de secretária; Organizadores; Planeadores; Calendários de parede